engverb.lexc
!!!engverb.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +V +1sg +2sg +3sg +3pl +CONTR +NEG +PRES +PROG +PAST +PPART +STR +Aux +Modal

LEXICON Root

Verb ;

LEXICON Vinf

[stem]+V+PRES:0 #;
[stem]+V+3sg+PRES:^s  #;
[stem]+V+PROG:^ing #;
[stem]+V+PAST:^ed #;

LEXICON Vinf_strong

[stem]+V+PRES:0 #;
[stem]+V+3sg+PRES:^s  #;
[stem]+V+PROG:^ing #;

LEXICON Vaux

[stem]+V+PRES+Aux:0 #;
[stem]+V+PROG+Aux:^ing #;

LEXICON Verb
Grecize Vinf;
Normanize Vinf;
abate Vinf;
abreact Vinf;
accent Vinf;
acculturate Vinf;
adjudge Vinf;
afflict Vinf;
alcoholize Vinf;
ambuscade Vinf;
ankylose Vinf;
ante Vinf_strong;
apperceive Vinf;
arise Vinf_strong;
array Vinf;
assort Vinf;
authenticate Vinf;
baby-sit Vinf_strong;
backbite Vinf_strong;
backfill Vinf;
backslide Vinf_strong;
bankroll Vinf;
batten Vinf;
be Vaux;
bear Vinf_strong;
beat Vinf_strong;
become Vinf_strong;
befall Vinf_strong;
befriend Vinf;
beget Vinf_strong;
begin Vinf_strong;
behold Vinf_strong;
belay Vinf_strong;
bend Vinf_strong;
benumb Vinf;
beset Vinf_strong;
bespeak Vinf_strong;
bestride Vinf_strong;
bet Vinf_strong;
betake Vinf_strong;
bethink Vinf_strong;
bicycle Vinf;
bid Vinf_strong;
bind Vinf_strong;
bite Vinf_strong;
bivouac Vinf_strong;
blacklist Vinf;
bleed Vinf_strong;
blitz Vinf;
bodge Vinf;
botanize Vinf;
bottle-feed Vinf_strong;
brawl Vinf;
break Vinf_strong;
breast-feed Vinf_strong;
breed Vinf_strong;
bring Vinf_strong;
briquette Vinf_strong;
bromate Vinf;
browbeat Vinf_strong;
build Vinf_strong;
bully Vinf;
burst Vinf_strong;
bushwhack Vinf;
buy Vinf_strong;
calk Vinf;
canton Vinf;
carpenter Vinf;
cast Vinf_strong;
catch Vinf_strong;
cauterize Vinf;
chair Vinf;
checker Vinf;
choose Vinf_strong;
chord Vinf;
circumnutate Vinf;
clad Vinf_strong;
cleat Vinf;
clem Vinf_strong;
clepe Vinf_strong;
cling Vinf_strong;
clump Vinf;
coerce Vinf;
collude Vinf;
come Vinf_strong;
companion Vinf;
concentrate Vinf;
conform Vinf;
consort Vinf;
contradict Vinf;
coordinate Vinf;
copyread Vinf_strong;
cost Vinf_strong;
costume Vinf;
countersink Vinf_strong;
covenant Vinf;
cover-up Vinf_strong;
crab Vinf_strong;
creep Vinf_strong;
crenellate Vinf;
cross-breed Vinf_strong;
cross-refer Vinf;
crossbreed Vinf_strong;
crosscut Vinf_strong;
cultivate Vinf;
cut Vinf_strong;
damask Vinf;
deaden Vinf;
deal Vinf_strong;
decertify Vinf;
decuple Vinf;
defraud Vinf;
delocalize Vinf;
denazify Vinf;
depolymerize Vinf;
descant Vinf;
detail Vinf;
diabolize Vinf;
die-cast Vinf_strong;
dig Vinf_strong;
dilute Vinf;
disassociate Vinf;
discourse Vinf;
disgruntle Vinf;
dispatch Vinf;
dissemble Vinf;
diverge Vinf;
do Vaux;
doodle Vinf;
drain Vinf;
draw Vinf_strong;
drink Vinf_strong;
drive Vinf_strong;
dump Vinf;
eat Vinf_strong;
educe Vinf;
elide Vinf;
embed Vinf_strong;
embower Vinf;
empanel Vinf_strong;
enchain Vinf;
enfold Vinf;
enroot Vinf;
enunciate Vinf;
enwind Vinf_strong;
eschew Vinf;
evaporate Vinf;
exculpate Vinf;
expertize Vinf;
extravagate Vinf;
face-off Vinf_strong;
fall Vinf_strong;
famish Vinf;
feaze Vinf;
feed Vinf_strong;
feel Vinf_strong;
fidge Vinf;
fight Vinf_strong;
find Vinf_strong;
fine-draw Vinf_strong;
first-foot Vinf;
fit Vinf_strong;
flee Vinf_strong;
fletch Vinf;
fling Vinf_strong;
floodlight Vinf_strong;
fluoridize Vinf;
fly Vinf_strong;
flyblow Vinf_strong;
foray Vinf;
forbear Vinf_strong;
forbid Vinf_strong;
force-feed Vinf_strong;
fordo Vinf_strong;
foreknow Vinf_strong;
forerun Vinf_strong;
foresee Vinf_strong;
foreshow Vinf_strong;
forespeak Vinf_strong;
foreswear Vinf_strong;
foretell Vinf_strong;
forget Vinf_strong;
forgive Vinf_strong;
forgo Vinf_strong;
formularize Vinf;
forsake Vinf_strong;
forspeak Vinf_strong;
free-wheel Vinf;
freeze Vinf_strong;
frolic Vinf_strong;
fuddle Vinf;
gallivant Vinf;
gauge Vinf;
get Vinf_strong;
gill Vinf;
give Vinf_strong;
glove Vinf;
got Vinf_strong;
grangerize Vinf;
grind Vinf_strong;
gross Vinf;
grow Vinf_strong;
guzzle Vinf;
hamstring Vinf_strong;
hand Vinf;
handfeed Vinf_strong;
hate Vinf;
have Vaux;
hear Vinf_strong;
heighten Vinf;
hide Vinf_strong;
hitch Vinf;
hold Vinf_strong;
honor Vinf;
huff Vinf;
hurt Vinf_strong;
hypnotize Vinf;
immaterialize Vinf;
implode Vinf;
inbreed Vinf_strong;
incept Vinf;
indwell Vinf;
initialize Vinf;
inlet Vinf_strong;
insulate Vinf;
interbreed Vinf_strong;
interlay Vinf_strong;
intermarry Vinf;
introduce Vinf;
inweave Vinf;
jargon Vinf;
joke Vinf;
keen Vinf;
keep Vinf_strong;
knit Vinf_strong;
kowtow Vinf;
largen Vinf;
lay Vinf_strong;
leave Vinf_strong;
lech Vinf;
let Vinf_strong;
like Vinf;
lobby Vinf;
lose Vinf_strong;
lull Vinf;
maim Vinf;
margin Vinf;
maturate Vinf;
mean Vinf_strong;
mesh Vinf;
milk Vinf;
mimic Vinf_strong;
miscast Vinf_strong;
misdate Vinf;
misgive Vinf_strong;
mishit Vinf_strong;
mislead Vinf_strong;
misread Vinf_strong;
mistake Vinf_strong;
mistreat Vinf;
moon Vinf;
move Vinf;
mutilate Vinf;
negotiate Vinf;
nip Vinf_strong;
nose-dive Vinf;
obsecrate Vinf;
opalesce Vinf;
oust Vinf;
outbid Vinf_strong;
outdo Vinf_strong;
outgo Vinf_strong;
outlay Vinf_strong;
outrank Vinf;
outrun Vinf_strong;
outshine Vinf_strong;
outspread Vinf_strong;
outthink Vinf_strong;
over-eat Vinf_strong;
overbid Vinf_strong;
overbuild Vinf_strong;
overcloud Vinf;
overdo Vinf_strong;
overdrive Vinf_strong;
overfly Vinf_strong;
overhang Vinf_strong;
overlay Vinf_strong;
overpay Vinf_strong;
overrun Vinf_strong;
overscore Vinf;
oversell Vinf_strong;
oversew Vinf_strong;
oversleep Vinf_strong;
overtake Vinf_strong;
overwind Vinf_strong;
ozonize Vinf;
panic Vinf_strong;
pantomime Vinf;
passage Vinf;
peen Vinf;
pen Vinf_strong;
permeate Vinf;
phosphatize Vinf;
physic Vinf_strong;
pillow Vinf;
place-kick Vinf;
plough Vinf;
polka Vinf;
postfix Vinf;
preachify Vinf;
precast Vinf_strong;
premise Vinf;
prey Vinf;
progress Vinf;
proof-read Vinf_strong;
proselyte Vinf;
pulp Vinf;
put Vinf_strong;
pyramid Vinf;
quit Vinf_strong;
quitclaim Vinf;
rampart Vinf;
razor-cut Vinf_strong;
re-cede Vinf;
read Vinf_strong;
realize Vinf;
rebuild Vinf_strong;
recentralize Vinf;
rectify Vinf;
redo Vinf_strong;
refile Vinf;
regurgitate Vinf;
relate Vinf;
remake Vinf_strong;
remould Vinf;
repay Vinf_strong;
replevy Vinf;
rerun Vinf_strong;
rescind Vinf;
reset Vinf_strong;
restring Vinf_strong;
restructure Vinf;
retell Vinf_strong;
reunify Vinf;
rewind Vinf_strong;
rhyme Vinf;
rid Vinf_strong;
ring Vinf_strong;
roentgenize Vinf;
rough-cast Vinf_strong;
route Vinf;
run Vinf_strong;
sack Vinf;
satirize Vinf;
say Vinf_strong;
schedule Vinf;
screech Vinf;
scuttle Vinf;
seek Vinf_strong;
semaphore Vinf;
send Vinf_strong;
shake Vinf_strong;
shamble Vinf;
shellac Vinf_strong;
shew Vinf_strong;
shingle Vinf;
shoe Vinf_strong;
shred Vinf_strong;
shroff Vinf;
shut Vinf_strong;
sight-read Vinf_strong;
silence Vinf;
sing Vinf_strong;
sit Vinf_strong;
skewer Vinf;
slaver Vinf;
sleep Vinf_strong;
sling Vinf_strong;
slit Vinf_strong;
slush Vinf;
sneak Vinf;
soft-soap Vinf;
soothsay Vinf_strong;
soundproof Vinf;
spellbind Vinf_strong;
spiflicate Vinf;
spin Vinf_strong;
split Vinf_strong;
sporulate Vinf;
spot Vinf_strong;
spring Vinf_strong;
squint Vinf;
stand Vinf_strong;
starve Vinf;
stick Vinf_strong;
still-hunt Vinf;
stink Vinf_strong;
strafe Vinf;
strike Vinf_strong;
stucco Vinf;
sublet Vinf_strong;
submerge Vinf;
sue Vinf;
supererogate Vinf;
surname Vinf;
swear Vinf_strong;
swelter Vinf;
swim Vinf_strong;
synthesize Vinf;
take Vinf_strong;
tarnish Vinf;
teach Vinf_strong;
tell Vinf_strong;
temper Vinf;
thermalize Vinf;
think Vinf_strong;
thrust Vinf_strong;
tide Vinf;
tittle-tattle Vinf;
toss Vinf;
transfigure Vinf;
transship Vinf_strong;
treat Vinf;
trounce Vinf;
tutor Vinf;
typecast Vinf_strong;
typewrite Vinf_strong;
unbind Vinf_strong;
unbridle Vinf;
underbuy Vinf_strong;
underfeed Vinf_strong;
underlay Vinf_strong;
underlie Vinf_strong;
underprice Vinf;
undersell Vinf_strong;
undershoot Vinf_strong;
undertake Vinf_strong;
undo Vinf_strong;
universalize Vinf;
unknit Vinf_strong;
unmake Vinf_strong;
unsettle Vinf;
unsling Vinf_strong;
unstick Vinf_strong;
unswear Vinf_strong;
unthink Vinf_strong;
unwind Vinf_strong;
upcast Vinf_strong;
uppercut Vinf_strong;
upset Vinf_strong;
upstage Vinf;
upsweep Vinf_strong;
variolate Vinf;
vest Vinf;
vocalize Vinf;
wail Vinf;
waste Vinf;
waylay Vinf_strong;
wed Vinf_strong;
welcome Vinf;
wet Vinf_strong;
whirl Vinf;
wing Vinf;
winterfeed Vinf_strong;
withdraw Vinf_strong;
withstand Vinf_strong;
word Vinf;
write Vinf_strong;
yack Vinf;
